02_Morphology/grn.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
%>                   ! Frontera de morfema
%<n%>                ! Nombre
%<gen%>              ! Genitivo
%<loc%>              ! Locativo
%<der_kue%>	     ! nominal past	
%<comp%>	     ! comparativo
%<pl%>		     ! plural
%{m%}                ! pe/me archiphoneme
%{g%}		     ! k/g archiphoneme
%{n%}		     ! n archiphoneme

LEXICON Root

Nouns ;

LEXICON N

%<n%>: CASE ;
%<n%>: SUBST ;
%<n%>: PL ;

LEXICON PL

%<pl%>:%>%{n%}%{g%}uéra CASE ;

LEXICON SUBST

%<der_kue%>:%>kue # "weight: 1.0" ;
%<comp%>:%>icha # ;

LEXICON CASE
%<nom%>: # ; ! ""
%<gen%>:%>gui #; ! "de"
%<loc%>:%>%{m%}e # ; ! "a, en"


LEXICON Nouns

ava:ava N ; ! "raza, gente"
aváicha:aváicha N ; ! "comp form"
óga:óga N ; ! "casa"
irũ:irũ N ; ! "amigo"
apyka:apyka N ; ! "silla"
irũnguéra:irũnguéra N ; ! "plural of iru"
apykakuéra:apykakuéra N ; ! "plural of apyka"
tembiasa:tembiasa N ; ! "experiencia"
tembiasakue:tembiasakue N ; ! "history"
akãvai:akãvai N; ! “locura”
akãvaicha:akãvaicha N ; ! "locura + comp"
